dev/adverb/adverb.ne.dix
  <!-- फेंरि; फेंरि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फेंरि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यसरि; यसरि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यसरि__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खुसुक्क; खुसुक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खुसुक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- टाडा; टाडा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="टाडा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हार्रहुर्र; हार्रहुर्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हार्रहुर्र__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सखारै; सखारै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सखारै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यिनैताका; यिनैताका; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यिनैताका__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संघै; संघै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संघै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अडाडि; अडाडि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अडाडि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जबसम्मः-; जबसम्मः-; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जबसम्मः-__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुक्क; सुक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सुक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दिनभरी; दिनभरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दिनभरी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भित्रभित्रै; भित्रभित्रै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भित्रभित्रै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सहयोगस्वरुप; सहयोगस्वरुप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सहयोगस्वरुप__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यथावतै; यथावतै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यथावतै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="फेंरि"><i>फेंरि</i><par n="फेंरि__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यसरि"><i>यसरि</i><par n="यसरि__"/></e>
    <e lm="खुसुक्क"><i>खुसुक्क</i><par n="खुसुक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="टाडा"><i>टाडा</i><par n="टाडा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="हार्रहुर्र"><i>हार्रहुर्र</i><par n="हार्रहुर्र__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सखारै"><i>सखारै</i><par n="सखारै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यिनैताका"><i>यिनैताका</i><par n="यिनैताका__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="संघै"><i>संघै</i><par n="संघै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अडाडि"><i>अडाडि</i><par n="अडाडि__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जबसम्मः-"><i>जबसम्मः-</i><par n="जबसम्मः-__"/></e>
    <e lm="सुक्क"><i>सुक्क</i><par n="सुक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="दिनभरी"><i>दिनभरी</i><par n="दिनभरी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="भित्रभित्रै"><i>भित्रभित्रै</i><par n="भित्रभित्रै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सहयोगस्वरुप"><i>सहयोगस्वरुप</i><par n="सहयोगस्वरुप__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यथावतै"><i>यथावतै</i><par n="यथावतै__adv"/></e>
